Tennessee, session 114, HB0043.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-1-302, is amended by adding the
following new subdivision:
( ) "Tennessee" by Arrested Development, as adopted by this act;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0043
000882
- 1 -